Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 2. Election Recounts.

Collateral references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 289-295.

Exclusion or inclusion of terminal Sunday or holiday in computing time for taking or perfecting appeal from decision of election board. 61 ALR2d 484.

Sec. 15.20.430.
Authorization of recount application.

A defeated candidate or 10 qualified voters who believe there has been a mistake made by an election official or by the counting board in counting the votes in an election, may file an application within five days after the completion of the state review to the director for a recount of the votes from any particular precinct or any house district and for any particular office, proposition, or question. However, the application may be filed only within three days after the completion of the state review after the general election for a recount of votes cast for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. If there is a tie vote as provided in AS

15.15.460

, the director shall initiate the recount and give notice to the interested parties as provided in AS

15.20.470

.

The date on which the director receives an application, rather than the date of mailing or transmission, determines whether the application is filed within the time allowed under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 4.71 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 20 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 93 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 48 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 46 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (b), deleted “If the actual physical delivery by telegram of a copy in substance of the statements made in the application for recount is received in the office of the director at or before 5:00 P.M. Alaska Standard Time on the due date, the application will be accepted; providing the original signed application is postmarked at or before 5:00 P.M. Alaska Standard Time of the same day.” at the end and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 15.20.440.
Form of application.

The application must state in substance the basis of the belief that a mistake has been made, the particular election precinct or house district for which the recount is to be held, the particular office, proposition, or question for which the recount is to be held, and that the person making the application is a candidate or that the 10 persons making the application are qualified voters. The candidate or persons making the application shall designate by full name and mailing address two persons who shall represent the applicant and be present and assist during the recount. Any person may be named representative, including the candidate or any person signing the application. Applications by 10 qualified voters must also include the designation of one of the number as chair. The candidate or persons making the application shall sign the application and shall print or type their full names and mailing addresses.

Candidates, political parties, or organized groups having a direct interest in a recount and who are seeking to protect their interests during a recount may provide, at their own expense, two or more observers to witness the recount.

History.

(§ 4.72 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 18 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 94 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 20 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 49 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.20.450.
Costs of recount; requirement of deposit.

The application must include a deposit in cash, by certified check, or by bond with a surety approved by the director. The amount of the deposit is $1,000 for each precinct, $2,000 for each house district, and $15,000 for the entire state. If the recount includes an office for which candidates received a tie vote, or the difference between the number of votes cast was 20 or less or was less than .5 percent of the total number of votes cast for the two candidates for the contested office, or a question or proposition for which there was a tie vote on the issue, or the difference between the number of votes cast in favor of or opposed to the issue was 20 or less or was less than .5 percent of the total votes cast in favor of or opposed to the issue, the application need not include a deposit, and the state shall bear the cost of the recount. If, on the recount, a candidate other than the candidate who received the original election certificate is declared elected, or if the vote on recount is determined to be four percent or more in excess of the vote reported by the state review for the candidate applying for the recount or in favor of or opposed to the question or proposition as stated in the application, the entire deposit shall be refunded. If the entire deposit is not refunded, the director shall refund any money remaining after the cost of the recount has been paid from the deposit.

History.

(§ 4.73 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 15 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 21 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1976; am § 95 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 50 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 21 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.20.460.
Determination of date of recount.

If the director determines that the application is substantially in the required form, the director shall fix the date of the recount to be held within three days after the receipt of an application requesting a recount of the general election votes cast for the office of governor and lieutenant governor and within five days after the receipt of an application requesting a recount for any other office, question, or proposition.

History.

(§ 4.74 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 96 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.20.470.
Requirement of notice.

The director shall give the candidate or designated chairperson signing the application, the two or more persons appointed to represent the applicant during the recount, and other directly interested parties, notice of the time and place of the recount by certified mail, telephone, or facsimile.

History.

(§ 4.75 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 97 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 47 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2000, “chairperson” was substituted for “chairman” in accordance with sec. 95(3), ch. 82, SLA 2000.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, near the end, deleted “telegraph,” following “certified mail,”.

Sec. 15.20.480.
Procedure for recount.

In conducting the recount, the director shall review all ballots, whether the ballots were counted at the precinct or by computer or by the district absentee counting board or the questioned ballot counting board, to determine which ballots, or part of ballots, were properly marked and which ballots are to be counted in the recount, and shall check the accuracy of the original count, the precinct certificate, and the review. The director shall count absentee ballots received before the completion of the recount. For administrative purposes, the director may join and include two or more applications in a single review and count of votes. The rules in AS

15.15.360

governing the counting of ballots shall be followed in the recount when a ballot is challenged on the basis of a question regarding the voter’s intent to vote for the candidate, proposition, or question. The ballots and other election material must remain in the custody of the director during the recount, and the highest degree of care shall be exercised to protect the ballots against alteration or mutilation. The recount shall be completed within 10 days. The director may employ additional personnel necessary to assist in the recount.

History.

(§ 4.76 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 98 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 22 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 13 ch 67 SLA 1989; am § 55 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 23 ch 113 SLA 2003)

Sec. 15.20.490.
Certification of results.

If it is determined by recount that the plurality of votes was cast for a candidate, the director shall issue a certificate of election or nomination to the elected or nominated candidate as determined by the recount.
If it is determined by the recount that a proposition or question should be certified as having received the required vote, the director shall so certify except that the lieutenant governor shall so certify if the proposition or question involves an initiative, a referendum, or a constitutional amendment.

History.

(§ 4.77 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 99 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Collateral references. —

Injunction against canvassing of votes and declaring result of election. 1 ALR2d 588.

Admissibility of parol evidence of election officials to impeach election returns. 46 ALR2d 1385.

Sec. 15.20.500.
Authorization for expanding recount. [Repealed, § 6 ch 26 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 15.20.510.
Provision for appeal to courts.

A candidate or any person who requested a recount who has reason to believe an error has been made in the recount (1) involving any question or proposition or the validity of any ballot may appeal to the superior court in accordance with applicable court rules governing appeals in civil matters, and (2) involving candidates for the legislature or Congress or the office of governor and lieutenant governor may appeal to the supreme court in accordance with rules as may be adopted by the court.
Appeal shall be filed within five days of the completion of the recount.
Upon order of the court, the director shall furnish the record of the recount taken, including all ballots, registers, and other election material and papers pertaining to the election contest. The appeal shall be heard by the court sitting without a jury. The inquiry in the appeal shall extend to the questions whether or not the director has properly determined what ballots, parts of ballots, or marks for candidates on ballots are valid, and to which candidate or division on the question or proposition the vote should be attributed.
The court shall enter judgment either setting aside, modifying, or affirming the action of the director on recount.

History.

(§ 4.79 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 19 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 100 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.20.520.
Provision for appeal to legislature or Congress.

A candidate or persons who requested a recount, who have reason to believe an error has been made in the recount involving a candidate for the general election for the state legislature or Congress, may appeal to the chamber in which the candidate seeks membership in accordance with applicable rules of the legislature or Congress.
Upon request of the legislature or Congress, the director shall furnish the record of the recount taken including all ballots, registers, and other election material and papers pertaining to the election contest.

History.

(§ 4.80 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 101 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Opinions of attorney general. —

AS

15.20.540

,

15.20.550

, and

15.20.560

, when read together, clearly state intention of legislature to permit appeal to superior court under certain circumstances, but the language of these sections is permissive. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

As an alternative means of contesting an election, the legislature provided (this section) for a direct appeal to the chamber in which the candidate seeks membership in accordance with the applicable rules of the legislature or Congress. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

Sec. 15.20.530.
Determination of tie votes.

If after a recount and appeal two or more candidates tie in having the highest number of votes for the same office, the director shall notify the candidates who are tied.
The director shall notify the candidates of a reasonably suitable time and place to determine the successful candidate by lot. After the determination has been made by lot, the director shall so certify.

History.

(§ 4.81 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 102 ch 100 SLA 1980)